Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE G. HEALTH COVERAGE AVAILABILITY

CHAPTER 1502. HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR CHILDREN

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1502.001. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to the issuer of a health benefit plan that:

(1) provides benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness, including:

(A) an individual, group, blanket, or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital service contract, or an individual or group evidence of coverage that is offered by:

(i) an insurance company;

(ii) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842;

(iii) a fraternal benefit society operating under Chapter 885;

(iv) a stipulated premium company operating under Chapter 884; or

(v) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843; and

(B) to the extent permitted by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Section 1001 et seq.), a health benefit plan that is offered by:

(i) a multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined by Section 3 of that Act or another analogous benefit arrangement; or

(ii) an entity not authorized under this code or another insurance law of this state that contracts directly for health care services on a risk-sharing basis, including a capitation basis; or

(2) is offered by an approved nonprofit health corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 844.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1502.0011. EXCEPTION. This chapter does not apply to a health benefit plan provided under the state Medicaid program or the state child health plan.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 11.061(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 1502.002. RULES. (a) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement this chapter, including rules necessary to:

(1) increase the availability of coverage to children younger than 19 years of age;

(2) establish an open enrollment period; and

(3) establish qualifying events as exceptions to the open enrollment period, including loss of coverage when a child becomes ineligible for coverage under the state child health plan.

(b) The commissioner may adopt rules on an emergency basis using the procedures established under Section 2001.034, Government Code.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (b), the commissioner is not required to make a finding under Section 2001.034(a), Government Code, before adopting rules on an emergency basis.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1147 (H.B. 1951), Sec. 9.001, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. CHILDREN'S HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN

Sec. 1502.051. CHILDREN'S HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN. A health benefit plan issuer may offer a children's health benefit plan that provides coverage only to children younger than 18 years of age. The issuer may offer the plan only if the commissioner approves the plan's structure and the benefits offered under the plan.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1502.052. MANDATED BENEFIT PROVISIONS INAPPLICABLE. A children's health benefit plan is not subject to any law that requires coverage or the offer of coverage of a health care service or benefit.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1502.053. EXEMPTION FROM CERTAIN TAXES. (a) The issuer of a children's health benefit plan approved under Section 1502.051 is not subject to the premium tax or the tax on revenues imposed under Chapter 222 with respect to money received for coverage provided under that plan.

(b) The issuer of a children's health benefit plan approved under Section 1502.051 is not subject to the retaliatory tax imposed under Chapter 281 with respect to money received for coverage provided under that plan.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 11.062(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 932 (H.B. 3315), Sec. 19, eff. June 15, 2007.